Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-606
Certified nurse midwife, defined.

Certified nurse midwife means a person certified by a board-approved certifying body and licensed under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice certified nurse midwifery in the State of Nebraska. Nothing in the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act is intended to restrict the practice of registered nurses.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1748;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 218.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.